Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2485.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act:

(1) Division means the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Local public health department means a local public health department as defined in section 71-1626;

(3) Opiate or opioid means any drug or other substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having such addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability;

(4) Opioid epidemic means the serious public health crisis stemming from the rapid increase in the use of prescription and nonprescription opioid drugs;

(5) Opioid remediation means care, treatment, and other programs and expenditures designed to (a) address the misuse and abuse of opioid products, (b) treat or mitigate opioid use or related disorders, (c) mitigate other effects of the opioid epidemic, including the effects on those injured as a result of the opioid epidemic, (d) support treatment of any co-occurring substance use disorder or mental health condition; and

(6) Regional behavioral health authority means an authority established pursuant to section 71-808.

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 7.